Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.280

Bail bond recovery agent, generally.

(1) A person may not perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent unless the person is licensed by the department under this chapter.

(2) A bail bond agent may contract with a person to perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent. Before contracting with the bail bond recovery agent, the bail bond agent must check the license issued by the department under this chapter. The requirements established by the department under this chapter do not prevent the bail bond agent from imposing additional requirements that the bail bond agent considers appropriate.

(3) A contract entered into under this chapter is authority for the person to perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent as specifically authorized by the contract and in accordance with applicable law. A contract entered into by a bail bond agent with a bail bond recovery agent is not transferable by the bail bond recovery agent to another bail bond recovery agent.

(4) Whenever a person licensed by the department as a bail bond recovery agent is engaged in the performance of the person's duties as a bail bond recovery agent, the person must carry a copy of the license.

(5) A license or endorsement issued by the department under this chapter is valid from the date the license or endorsement is issued until its expiration date unless it is suspended or revoked by the department prior to its expiration date.

(6) Nothing in this chapter is meant to prevent a bail bond agent from contacting a fugitive criminal defendant for the purpose of requesting the surrender of the fugitive, or from accepting the voluntary surrender of the fugitive.

[ 2008 c 105 s 7; 2004 c 186 s 10.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.